Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control

§ 67-1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control Law” of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-3.
Prohibition reannounced as law of State.

The policy of this State is reannounced in favor of prohibition of the manufacture, sale, distribution, possession and transportation of intoxicating liquor; and the provisions against such manufacture, sale, distribution, possession and transportation of intoxicating liquor, as contained in Chapter 31 of Title 97, Mississippi Code of 1972 and elsewhere, are hereby redeclared the law of this state. The purpose and intent of this chapter is to vigorously enforce the prohibition laws throughout the state, except in those counties and municipalities voting themselves out from under the prohibition law in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and, in those counties and municipalities, to require strict regulation and supervision of the manufacture, sale, distribution, possession and transportation of intoxicating liquor under a system of state licensing of manufacturers, wholesalers and retailers, which licenses shall be subject to revocation for violations of this chapter.

All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this chapter are repealed only to the extent of such conflict; however, except as is provided in this chapter, all laws prohibiting the manufacture, sale, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages, which are not in conflict with this chapter shall remain in full force and effect, and all such laws shall remain in full force and effect in counties and municipalities wherein the manufacture, sale, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages has not been authorized as a result of an election held under Section 67-1-11 or Section 67-1-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, or as otherwise provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 10265-01, 10265-36; Laws, 1966, §§ 1, 36; Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1990).

§ 67-1-5.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter and unless otherwise required by the context:

“Alcoholic beverage” means any alcoholic liquid, including wines of more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight, capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being, but shall not include light wine and beer, as defined in Section 67-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, but shall include native wines. The words “alcoholic beverage” shall not include ethyl alcohol manufactured or distilled solely for fuel purposes or beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if the beer is legally manufactured in this state for sale in another state.

“Alcohol” means the product of distillation of any fermented liquid, whatever the origin thereof, and includes synthetic ethyl alcohol, but does not include denatured alcohol or wood alcohol.

“Distilled spirits” means any beverage containing more than four percent (4%) of alcohol by weight produced by distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar, including dilutions and mixtures of these beverages.

“Wine” or “vinous liquor” means any product obtained from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe grapes, fruits or berries and made in accordance with the revenue laws of the United States.

“Person” means and includes any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity whatsoever.

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in manufacturing, distilling, rectifying, blending or bottling any alcoholic beverage.

“Wholesaler” means any person, other than a manufacturer, engaged in distributing or selling any alcoholic beverage at wholesale for delivery within or without this state when such sale is for the purpose of resale by the purchaser.

“Retailer” means any person who sells, distributes, or offers for sale or distribution, any alcoholic beverage for use or consumption by the purchaser and not for resale.

“State Tax Commission,” “commission” or “department” means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi, which shall create a division in its organization to be known as the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. Any reference to the commission or the department hereafter means the powers and duties of the Department of Revenue with reference to supervision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

“Division” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or town of this state.

“Hotel” means an establishment within a municipality, or within a qualified resort area approved as such by the department, where, in consideration of payment, food and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located at least twenty (20) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations. Hotels in towns or cities of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) population are similarly defined except that they must have fifty (50) or more sleeping rooms. Any such establishment described in this paragraph with less than fifty (50) beds shall operate one or more regular dining rooms designed to be constantly frequented by customers each day. When used in this chapter, the word “hotel” shall also be construed to include any establishment that meets the definition of “bed and breakfast inn” as provided in this section.

“Restaurant” means:

A place which is regularly and in a bona fide manner used and kept open for the serving of meals to guests for compensation, which has suitable seating facilities for guests, and which has suitable kitchen facilities connected therewith for cooking an assortment of foods and meals commonly ordered at various hours of the day; the service of such food as sandwiches and salads only shall not be deemed in compliance with this requirement. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, no place shall qualify as a restaurant under this chapter unless twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the revenue derived from such place shall be from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, or unless the value of food given to and consumed by customers is equal to twenty-five percent (25%) or more of total revenue; or

Any privately owned business located in a building in a historic district where the district is listed in the National Register of Historic Places, where the building has a total occupancy rating of not less than one thousand (1,000) and where the business regularly utilizes ten thousand (10,000) square feet or more in the building for live entertainment, including not only the stage, lobby or area where the audience sits and/or stands, but also any other portion of the building necessary for the operation of the business, including any kitchen area, bar area, storage area and office space, but excluding any area for parking. In addition to the other requirements of this subparagraph, the business must also serve food to guests for compensation within the building and derive the majority of its revenue from event-related fees, including, but not limited to, admission fees or ticket sales to live entertainment in the building, and from the rental of all or part of the facilities of the business in the building to another party for a specific event or function.

“Club” means an association or a corporation:

Organized or created under the laws of this state for a period of five (5) years prior to July 1, 1966;

Organized not primarily for pecuniary profit but for the promotion of some common object other than the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages;

Maintained by its members through the payment of annual dues;

Owning, hiring or leasing a building or space in a building of such extent and character as may be suitable and adequate for the reasonable and comfortable use and accommodation of its members and their guests;

The affairs and management of which are conducted by a board of directors, board of governors, executive committee, or similar governing body chosen by the members at a regular meeting held at some periodic interval; and

No member, officer, agent or employee of which is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of a salary or other compensation any profit from the distribution or sale of alcoholic beverages to the club or to members or guests of the club beyond such salary or compensation as may be fixed and voted at a proper meeting by the board of directors or other governing body out of the general revenues of the club.

The department may, in its discretion, waive the five-year provision of this paragraph. In order to qualify under this paragraph, a club must file with the department, at the time of its application for a license under this chapter, two (2) copies of a list of the names and residences of its members and similarly file, within ten (10) days after the election of any additional member, his name and address. Each club applying for a license shall also file with the department at the time of the application a copy of its articles of association, charter of incorporation, bylaws or other instruments governing the business and affairs thereof.

“Qualified resort area” means any area or locality outside of the limits of incorporated municipalities in this state commonly known and accepted as a place which regularly and customarily attracts tourists, vacationists and other transients because of its historical, scenic or recreational facilities or attractions, or because of other attributes which regularly and customarily appeal to and attract tourists, vacationists and other transients in substantial numbers; however, no area or locality shall so qualify as a resort area until it has been duly and properly approved as such by the department. The department may not approve an area as a qualified resort area after July 1, 2018, if any portion of such proposed area is located within two (2) miles of a convent or monastery that is located in a county traversed by Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 98. A convent or monastery may waive such distance restrictions in favor of allowing approval by the department of an area as a qualified resort area. Such waiver shall be in written form from the owner, the governing body, or the appropriate officer of the convent or monastery having the authority to execute such a waiver, and the waiver shall be filed with and verified by the department before becoming effective.

The department may approve an area or locality outside of the limits of an incorporated municipality that is in the process of being developed as a qualified resort area if such area or locality, when developed, can reasonably be expected to meet the requisites of the definition of the term “qualified resort area.” In such a case, the status of qualified resort area shall not take effect until completion of the development.

The term includes any state park which is declared a resort area by the department; however, such declaration may only be initiated in a written request for resort area status made to the department by the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and no permit for the sale of any alcoholic beverage, as defined in this chapter, except an on-premises retailer’s permit, shall be issued for a hotel, restaurant or bed and breakfast inn in such park.

The term includes:

1. The clubhouses associated with the state park golf courses at the Lefleur’s Bluff State Park, the John Kyle State Park, the Percy Quin State Park and the Hugh White State Park;

2. The clubhouse and associated golf course where the golf course is adjacent to one or more planned residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least seven hundred fifty (750) acres and at least four hundred (400) residential units;

3. Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least three thousand (3,000) contiguous acres with no public roads and that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility;

4. Any facility located on federal property surrounding a lake and designated as a recreational area by the United States Army Corps of Engineers that consists of at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) acres;

5. Any facility that is located in a municipality that is bordered by the Pearl River, traversed by Mississippi Highway 25, adjacent to the boundaries of the Jackson International Airport and is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law; however, any such facility may only be located in areas designated by the governing authorities of such municipality;

6. Any municipality with a population in excess of ten thousand (10,000) according to the latest federal decennial census that is located in a county that is bordered by the Pearl River and is not traversed by Interstate Highway 20, with a population in excess of forty-five thousand (45,000) according to the latest federal decennial census; however, the governing authorities of such a municipality may by ordinance:

a. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale;

b. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages;

c. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located;

7. The West Pearl Restaurant Tax District as defined in Chapter 912, Local and Private Laws of 2007;

8. a. Land that is located in any county in which Mississippi Highway 43 and Mississippi Highway 25 intersect and:

A. Owned by the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, and/or

B. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, east of Old Fannin Road, north of Regatta Drive, south of Spillway Road, west of Hugh Ward Boulevard and accessible by Old Fannin Road, Spillway Road, Spann Drive and/or Lake Vista Place, and/or

C. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, west of Old Fannin Road, south of Spillway Road and extending to the boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Flowood, Mississippi;

b. The board of supervisors of such county, with respect to B and C of this item 8, may by resolution or other order:

A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale,

B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, and

C. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located;

9. Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least eight hundred (800) contiguous acres with no public roads, that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility, and has accommodations for at least fifty (50) overnight guests;

10. Any facility that:

a. Consists of at least six thousand (6,000) square feet being heated and cooled along with an additional adjacent area that consists of at least two thousand two hundred (2,200) square feet regardless of whether heated and cooled,

b. For a fee is used to host events such as weddings, reunions and conventions,

c. Provides lodging accommodations regardless of whether part of the facility and/or located adjacent to or in close proximity to the facility, and

d. Is located on property that consists of at least thirty (30) contiguous acres;

11. Any facility and related property:

a. Located on property that consists of at least one hundred twenty-five (125) contiguous acres and consisting of an eighteen (18) hole golf course, and/or located in a facility that consists of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled,

b. Used for the purpose of providing meals and hosting events, and

c. Used for the purpose of teaching culinary arts courses and/or turf management and grounds keeping courses, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses;

12. Any facility and related property that:

a. Consist of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled,

b. For a fee is used to host events,

c. Is used for the purpose of culinary arts courses, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses;

13. The clubhouse and associated golf course where the golf course is adjacent to one or more residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least two hundred (200) acres and at least one hundred fifty (150) residential units and are located a. in a county that has voted against coming out from under the dry law; and b. outside of but in close proximity to a municipality in such county which has voted under Section 67-1-14, after January 1, 2013, to come out from under the dry law;

14. The clubhouse and associated eighteen (18) hole golf course located in a municipality traversed by Interstate Highway 55 and U.S. Highway 51 that has voted to come out from under the dry law;

15. Land that is planned for mixed use development and consists of at least two hundred (200) contiguous acres with one or more planned residential developments collectively planned to include at least two hundred (200) residential units when completed and which land is located:

a. In a county that has voted to come out from under the dry law,

b. Outside the corporate limits of any municipality in such county and adjacent to or in close proximity to a golf course located in a municipality in such county, and

c. Within one (1) mile of a state institution of higher learning.

The status of these municipalities, districts, clubhouses, facilities, golf courses and areas described in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (o) as qualified resort areas does not require any declaration of same by the department.

“Native wine” means any product, produced in Mississippi for sale, having an alcohol content not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by weight and made in accordance with revenue laws of the United States, which shall be obtained primarily from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of ripe grapes, fruits, berries or vegetables grown and produced in Mississippi; provided that bulk, concentrated or fortified wines used for blending may be produced without this state and used in producing native wines. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to permit a producer to import such bulk and/or fortified wines into this state for use in blending with native wines without payment of any excise tax that would otherwise accrue thereon.

“Native winery” means any place or establishment within the State of Mississippi where native wine is produced, in whole or in part, for sale.

“Bed and breakfast inn” means an establishment within a municipality where in consideration of payment, breakfast and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located not less than eight (8) and not more than nineteen (19) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities, that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations; however, such restriction on the minimum number of sleeping rooms shall not apply to establishments on the National Register of Historic Places. No place shall qualify as a bed and breakfast inn under this chapter unless on the date of the initial application for a license under this chapter more than fifty percent (50%) of the sleeping rooms are located in a structure formerly used as a residence.

“Board” shall refer to the Board of Tax Appeals of the State of Mississippi.

“Spa facility” means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a hotel where, in consideration of payment, patrons receive from licensed professionals a variety of private personal care treatments such as massages, facials, waxes, exfoliation and hairstyling.

“Art studio or gallery” means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area that is in the sole business of allowing patrons to view and/or purchase paintings and other creative artwork.

“Cooking school” means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a nationally recognized company that offers an established culinary education curriculum and program where, in consideration of payment, patrons are given scheduled professional group instruction on culinary techniques. For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of cooking school shall not include schools or classes offered by grocery stores, convenience stores or drugstores.

“Campus” means property owned by a public school district, community or junior college, college or university in this state where educational courses are taught, school functions are held, tests and examinations are administered or academic course credits are awarded; however, the term shall not include any “restaurant” or “hotel” that is located on property owned by a community or junior college, college or university in this state, and is operated by a third party who receives all revenue generated from food and alcoholic beverage sales.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-05; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 5; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 12; Laws, 1977, ch. 488, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 358; Laws, 1988, ch. 384; Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 558, § 20; Laws, 1998, ch. 306, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 453, § 19; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 366, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 126; Laws, 2009, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 323, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 501, § 7; Laws, 2014, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-1-7.
General applicability of chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 67-9-1 for the transportation and possession of limited amounts of alcoholic beverages for the use of an alcohol processing permittee, and subject to all of the provisions and restrictions contained in this chapter, the manufacture, sale, distribution, possession and transportation of alcoholic beverages shall be lawful, subject to the restrictions hereinafter imposed, in those counties and municipalities of this state in which, at a local option election called and held for that purpose under the provisions of this chapter, a majority of the qualified electors voting in such election shall vote in favor thereof. Except as otherwise provided in Section 67-1-51 for holders of a caterer’s permit, the manufacture, sale and distribution of alcoholic beverages shall not be permissible or lawful in counties except in (a) incorporated municipalities located within such counties, (b) qualified resort areas within such counties approved as such by the State Tax Commission, or (c) clubs within such counties, whether within a municipality or not. The manufacture, sale, distribution and possession of native wines shall be lawful in any location within any such county except those locations where the manufacture, sale or distribution is prohibited by law other than this section or by regulations of the commission.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, within any state park or any state park facility that has been declared a qualified resort area by the commission, and within any qualified resort area as defined under Section 67-1-5(o)(iii), an on-premises retailer’s permit may be issued for the qualified resort area, and the permittee may lawfully sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on his licensed premises regardless of whether or not the county or municipality in which the qualified resort area is located has voted in favor of coming out from under the dry law, and it shall be lawful to receive, store, sell, possess and consume alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises, and to sell, distribute and transport alcoholic beverages to the licensed premises.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-04; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 13; Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 558, § 21; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 6; Laws, 2008, ch. 366, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 558, § 3, eff May 26, 2009 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section.).

§ 67-1-9.
Alcoholic beverages prohibited except as authorized in this chapter; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, distill, brew, sell, possess, import into this state, export from the state, transport, distribute, warehouse, store, solicit, take order for, bottle, rectify, blend, treat, mix or process any alcoholic beverage except as authorized in this chapter. However, nothing contained herein shall prevent importers, wineries and distillers of alcoholic beverages from storing such alcoholic beverages in private bonded warehouses located within the State of Mississippi for the ultimate use and benefit of the Department of Revenue as provided in Section 67-1-41. The department is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the establishment of such private bonded warehouses and for the control of alcoholic beverages stored in such warehouses. Additionally, nothing herein contained shall prevent any duly licensed practicing physician or dentist from possessing or using alcoholic liquor in the strict practice of his profession, or prevent any hospital or other institution caring for sick and diseased persons, from possessing and using alcoholic liquor for the treatment of bona fide patients of such hospital or other institution. Any drugstore employing a licensed pharmacist may possess and use alcoholic liquors in the combination of prescriptions of duly licensed physicians. The possession and dispensation of wine by an authorized representative of any church for the purpose of conducting any bona fide rite or religious ceremony conducted by such church shall not be prohibited by this chapter.

Any person, upon conviction of any provision of this section, shall be punished as follows:

By a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than one (1) week nor more than three (3) months, or both, for the first conviction under this section.

By a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail not less than sixty (60) days, nor more than six (6) months, or both fine and imprisonment, for the second conviction for violating this section.

By a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary not less than one (1) year, nor more than five (5) years, or both fine and imprisonment, for conviction the third time under this section for the violation thereof after having been twice convicted of its violation.

Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful to transport bottles or containers of alcoholic beverages that are legally purchased in this state if the bottles or containers are unopened and are being transported on state or federal highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-06; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 412; Laws, 1993, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1993; Laws, 2018, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-1-10.
Penalties for owning, controlling or possessing illegal distillery, or parts thereof; exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to own or control or have in such person’s, firm’s or corporation’s possession any distillery commonly called a still or any integral part thereof. It shall not be unlawful to own or have in possession a distillery or still in the following circumstances:

Where the same is used exclusively for the distillation of rosin products;

Where the same is used exclusively for the distillation of water;

Where the same is kept and lawfully used in any laboratory;

Where the same is in the possession of any officers of the law, to be disposed of according to law; or

Where the person or corporation can prove that the same is in his or their possession for the purpose of being delivered up to an officer of the law to be disposed of according to law. Any person guilty of violating this section shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be confined in the State Penitentiary not less than one (1) year, nor more than three (3) years for a first offense, and for a second offense he shall be confined in the State Penitentiary not less than five (5), nor more than ten (10) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 505, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 67-1-11.
Local option election to render chapter effective in county.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the legalizing provisions of this chapter, except as authorized under Section 67-9-1 and Section 67-1-7(2), shall not be effective, applicable or operative in any county unless and until a local option election shall be called and held in such county in the manner and with the results hereinafter provided.

Upon presentation and filing of a proper petition requesting same signed by at least twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1,500), whichever number is the lesser, of the qualified electors of the county, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to call an election at which there shall be submitted to the qualified electors of the county the question of whether or not the sale, distribution and possession of alcoholic liquors shall be permitted in such county as provided in this chapter. Such election shall be held and conducted by the county election commissioners on a date fixed by the order of the board of supervisors, which date shall not be more than sixty (60) days from the date of the filing of said petition. Notice thereof shall be given by publishing such notice once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in said county or, if no newspaper be published therein, by such publication in a newspaper in an adjoining county and having a general circulation in the county involved. The election shall be held not earlier than fifteen (15) days from the first publication of such notice.

Said election shall be held and conducted as far as may be possible in the same manner as is provided by law for the holding of general elections. The ballots used thereat shall contain a brief statement of the proposition submitted and, on separate lines, the words “I vote FOR coming out from under the dry law in_______________County ( )”“I vote AGAINST coming out from under the dry law in _______________County ( )” with appropriate boxes in which the voters may express their choice. All qualified electors may vote by marking the ballot with a cross (x) or check ( ) mark opposite the words of their choice.

The election commissioners shall canvass and determine the results of said election, and shall certify same to the board of supervisors which shall adopt and spread upon its minutes an order declaring such results. If, in such election, a majority of the qualified electors participating therein shall vote in favor of the proposition, this chapter shall become applicable and operative in such county and the manufacture, sale, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages therein shall be lawful to the extent and in the manner permitted hereby. If, on the other hand, a majority of the qualified electors participating in the election shall vote against the proposition, this chapter, except for Section 67-9-1 and 67-1-7(2), shall not become effective and operative in such county and, except as otherwise provided under Section 67-9-1 and 67-1-7(2), all laws prohibiting and regulating the manufacture, sale, distribution and possession of intoxicating liquor shall remain in full force and effect and be administered and vigorously prosecuted therein. In either case, no further election shall be held in said county under the provisions of this chapter for a period of two (2) years from the date of the prior election and then only upon the filing of a petition requesting same signed by at least twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1,500), whichever number is the lesser, of the qualified electors of the county as is otherwise provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 35; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 67-1-13.
Local option election to render chapter ineffective in county.

When this chapter has been made effective and operative in any county as a result of an election called and held as provided in Section 67-1-11, the same may be made ineffective and inapplicable therein by an election called and held upon a petition filed with the board of supervisors requesting same signed by at least twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever number is the lesser, of the qualified electors of the county as is otherwise provided in Section 67-1-11, all of the provisions of which shall be fully applicable thereto. However, nothing herein shall authorize or permit the calling and holding of any election under this chapter in any county more often than once every two (2) years. If in such election, a majority of the qualified electors participating therein shall vote against the legalized sale of intoxicating liquor, then the prohibition laws of the State of Mississippi, except as otherwise provided under Section 67-9-1 and 67-1-7(2), shall become applicable in said county.

Notwithstanding an election reinstating the prohibition laws in a political subdivision, the holder of a native wine producer’s permit or a native wine retailer’s permit is allowed to continue to operate under such permits and to renew such permits. Possession of native wines and personal property related to the activities of the native wine permit holder which would otherwise be unlawful under prohibition shall be allowed subject to regulations of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 35; Laws, 1984, ch. 411; Laws, 1996, ch. 417, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 397, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.